Florida, session 2026, SB1034.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 25 26 Section 1.âSection 395.1075, Florida Statutes, is created 27 to read: 28 395.1075âCentral service technician services.â 29 (1)âLEGISLATIVE PURPOSE AND INTENT.âThe legislative purpose 30 for enacting this section is to ensure that every new central 31 service technician employed by a hospital or an ambulatory 32 surgical center in this state meets minimum requirements for 33 safe practice as a member of the surgical care team. It is the 34 intent of the Legislature that central service technicians who 35 fall below minimum competency or who otherwise present a danger 36 to public health and safety be prohibited from practicing in 37 this state. 38 (2)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 39 (a)ââCentral service technicianâ means a person who 40 decontaminates, inspects, assembles, disassembles, packages, and 41 sterilizes reusable medical instruments or devices for use by a 42 licensed facility. 43 (b)ââHealth care practitionerâ has the same meaning as in 44 s. 456.001. 45 (3)âCERTIFICATION AND CONTINUING EDUCATION REQUIREMENTS FOR 46 CENTRAL SERVICE TECHNICIANS.â 47 (a)âA licensed facility shall employ or otherwise retain 48 the services of a central service technician only if such person 49 has successfully passed a nationally accredited exam for central 50 service technicians and meets at least one of the following 51 criteria: 52 1.âHolds and maintains a certified registered central 53 service technician credential issued by a nationally accredited 54 central service credentialing organization. 55 2.âHolds and maintains a certified sterile processing and 56 distribution technician credential issued by a nationally 57 accredited central service credentialing organization. 58 3.âProvides evidence that he or she was employed by, or 59 provided services of a central service technician to, a licensed 60 facility on or before December 31, 2026. 61 (b)âA central service technician who does not meet the 62 requirements of paragraph (a) must obtain the required certified 63 registered central service technician credential or certified 64 sterile processing and distribution technician credential within 65 18 months after his or her date of hire in order to continue 66 employment as a central service technician. 67 (c)âA person who qualifies under paragraph (a) to practice 68 as a central service technician in a licensed facility must 69 complete at least 10 hours of continuing education annually to 70 continue employment as a central service technician. The 71 continuing education must be related to the functions of a 72 central service technician. 73 (d)âA licensed facility shall, upon the written request of 74 a central service technician, verify, in writing, the central 75 service technicianâs dates of employment or the contract period 76 during which the central service technician provided services to 77 the licensed facility. 78 (4)âEXEMPTIONS.âThis section does not apply to: 79 (a)âA health care practitioner if he or she is acting 80 within the scope of his or her license or certification. 81 (b)âA student or an intern if he or she is performing the 82 functions of a central service technician under the direct 83 supervision of a health care practitioner as part of the 84 studentâs or internâs training or internship. 85 (c)âA person who holds and maintains a registration, 86 certification, or license from a nationally accredited 87 credentialing organization to perform health services. 88 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.